Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-333
Act, how cited.

Sections 3-301 to 3-333 shall be known and may be cited as
the Airport Zoning Act.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 15, p. 691;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 21.